California statutes. Water Code
The board shall determine the areas benefited by facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control based on information developed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Levee Flood Protection Zone Maps [9130. - 9130.]

9130.

(a) The department shall prepare and maintain maps for levee flood protection zones. The department shall prepare the maps by December 31, 2008, and shall include in the maps a designation of those lands where flood levels would be more than three feet deep if a project levee were to fail, using the best available information. The maps shall include other flood depth contours if that information is available.

(b) The department shall distribute the levee flood protection zone maps to appropriate governmental agencies, as determined by the department.

(c) The department shall make the maps readily available to the public. The department may charge a fee for the cost of reproducing the maps. To the extent feasible, maps shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the department.

(d) The department may periodically revise the maps to include updated information when that information becomes available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Reports [9140. - 9142.]

9140.

(a) On or before September 30 of each year, a local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a project levee shall prepare and submit to the department, in a format specified by the department, a report of information for inclusion in periodic flood management reports prepared by the department relating to the project levee. The information submitted to the department shall include all of the following:

(1) Information known to the local agency that is relevant to the condition or performance of the project levee.

(2) Information identifying known conditions that might impair or compromise the level of flood protection provided by the project levee.

(3) A summary of the maintenance performed by the local agency during the previous fiscal year.

(4) A statement of work and estimated cost for operation and maintenance of the project levee for the current fiscal year, as approved by the local agency.

(5) Any other readily available information contained in the records of the local agency relevant to the condition or performance of the project levee, as determined by the board or the department.

(b) A local agency described in subdivision (a) that operates and maintains a nonproject levee that also benefits land within the boundaries of the area benefited by the project levee shall include information pursuant to subdivision (a) with regard to the nonproject levee.

(c) A local agency that incurs costs for the maintenance or improvement of a project or nonproject levee under the delta levee maintenance subventions program established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6 may submit information submitted to satisfy the requirements of that program to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), but may do so only for that reach of the levee included in that program.

(d) (1) A local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a levee not otherwise subject to this section may voluntarily prepare and submit to the department or the board a flood management report for posting on the Internet Web site of the department or the board.

(2) A flood management report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the board if the local agency is partially or wholly within the geographical boundaries of the board’s jurisdiction. Otherwise, the report shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

9141.

(a) The department shall prepare and transmit to the board a report on the project levees operated and maintained by each local agency, using information provided by the local agency pursuant to Section 9140 and information from relevant portions of any of the following documents, as determined by the department:

(1) Annual inspection reports on local agency maintenance prepared by the department or the board.

(2) The State Plan of Flood Control.

(3) The flood control system status report described in Section 9120.

(4) The schedule for mapping described in Section 8612.

(5) Any correspondence, document, or information deemed relevant by the department.

(b) The department shall make the flood management report for each local agency available on the Internet Web site of the board and shall provide the report to all of the following entities:

(1) The local agency.

(2) Any city or county within the local agency’s jurisdiction.

(3) Any public library located within the local agency’s jurisdiction.

(c) The report shall be completed on or before December 31, 2008, and shall be updated annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

9142.

A local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a project levee may propose to the board an upgrade of the project levee if the local agency determines that the upgrade is appropriate. The local agency may implement that upgrade if approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section in the Chapter 9 added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Reports [9110. - 9142.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [9110. - 9110.]

9110.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Fiscal year” has the same meaning as that set forth in Section 13290 of the Government Code.

(b) “Levee flood protection zone” means the area, as determined by the board or the department, that is protected by a project levee.

(c) “Local agency” means a local agency responsible for the maintenance of a project levee.

(d) “Maintenance” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 12878.

(e) “Project levee” means any levee that is part of the facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(f) “State Plan of Flood Control” means the state and federal flood control works, lands, programs, plans, policies, conditions, and mode of maintenance and operations of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project described in Section 8350, and of flood control projects in the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River watersheds authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12648) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 6 for which the board or the department has provided the assurances of nonfederal cooperation to the United States, and those facilities identified in Section 8361.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Reports [9120. - 9122.]

9120.

(a) The department shall prepare and the board shall adopt a flood control system status report for the State Plan of Flood Control. This status report shall be updated periodically, as determined by the board. For the purposes of preparing the report, the department shall inspect the project levees and review available information to ascertain whether there are evident deficiencies.

(b) The status report shall include identification and description of each facility, an estimate of the risk of levee failure, a discussion of the inspection and review undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a), and appropriate recommendations regarding the levees and future work activities.

(c) On or before December 31, 2008, the board shall advise the Legislature, in writing, as to the board’s schedule of implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9121.

(a) On or before September 1, 2010, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall provide written notice to each landowner whose property is determined to be entirely or partially within a levee flood protection zone.

(b) The notice shall include statements regarding all of the following:

(1) The property is located behind a levee.

(2) Levees reduce, but do not eliminate, the risk of flooding and are subject to catastrophic failure.

(3) If available, the level of flood risk as described in the flood control system status report described in Section 9120 and a levee flood protection zone map prepared in accordance with Section 9130.

(4) The state recommends that property owners in a levee flood protection zone obtain flood insurance, such as insurance provided by the Federal Emergency Management Agency through the National Flood Insurance Program.

(5) Information about purchasing federal flood insurance.

(6) The Internet address of the Web site that contains the information required by the flood management report described in Section 9141.

(7) Any other information determined by the department to be relevant.

(c) A county, with assistance from the department, shall annually provide to the department, by electronic means, lists of names and addresses of property owners in a levee flood protection zone located in that county.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the department may enter into contracts with private companies to provide the notices required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9122.

The board shall determine the areas benefited by facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control based on information developed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Levee Flood Protection Zone Maps [9130. - 9130.]

9130.

(a) The department shall prepare and maintain maps for levee flood protection zones. The department shall prepare the maps by December 31, 2008, and shall include in the maps a designation of those lands where flood levels would be more than three feet deep if a project levee were to fail, using the best available information. The maps shall include other flood depth contours if that information is available.

(b) The department shall distribute the levee flood protection zone maps to appropriate governmental agencies, as determined by the department.

(c) The department shall make the maps readily available to the public. The department may charge a fee for the cost of reproducing the maps. To the extent feasible, maps shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the department.

(d) The department may periodically revise the maps to include updated information when that information becomes available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Reports [9140. - 9142.]

9140.

(a) On or before September 30 of each year, a local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a project levee shall prepare and submit to the department, in a format specified by the department, a report of information for inclusion in periodic flood management reports prepared by the department relating to the project levee. The information submitted to the department shall include all of the following:

(1) Information known to the local agency that is relevant to the condition or performance of the project levee.

(2) Information identifying known conditions that might impair or compromise the level of flood protection provided by the project levee.

(3) A summary of the maintenance performed by the local agency during the previous fiscal year.

(4) A statement of work and estimated cost for operation and maintenance of the project levee for the current fiscal year, as approved by the local agency.

(5) Any other readily available information contained in the records of the local agency relevant to the condition or performance of the project levee, as determined by the board or the department.

(b) A local agency described in subdivision (a) that operates and maintains a nonproject levee that also benefits land within the boundaries of the area benefited by the project levee shall include information pursuant to subdivision (a) with regard to the nonproject levee.

(c) A local agency that incurs costs for the maintenance or improvement of a project or nonproject levee under the delta levee maintenance subventions program established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6 may submit information submitted to satisfy the requirements of that program to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), but may do so only for that reach of the levee included in that program.

(d) (1) A local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a levee not otherwise subject to this section may voluntarily prepare and submit to the department or the board a flood management report for posting on the Internet Web site of the department or the board.

(2) A flood management report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the board if the local agency is partially or wholly within the geographical boundaries of the board’s jurisdiction. Otherwise, the report shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9141.

(a) The department shall prepare and transmit to the board a report on the project levees operated and maintained by each local agency, using information provided by the local agency pursuant to Section 9140 and information from relevant portions of any of the following documents, as determined by the department:

(1) Annual inspection reports on local agency maintenance prepared by the department or the board.

(2) The State Plan of Flood Control.

(3) The flood control system status report described in Section 9120.

(4) The schedule for mapping described in Section 8612.

(5) Any correspondence, document, or information deemed relevant by the department.

(b) The department shall make the flood management report for each local agency available on the Internet Web site of the board and shall provide the report to all of the following entities:

(1) The local agency.

(2) Any city or county within the local agency’s jurisdiction.

(3) Any public library located within the local agency’s jurisdiction.

(c) The report shall be completed on or before December 31, 2008, and shall be updated annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9142.

A local agency responsible for the operation and maintenance of a project levee may propose to the board an upgrade of the project levee if the local agency determines that the upgrade is appropriate. The local agency may implement that upgrade if approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. RECLAMATION BOARD BOND ACT [9250. - 9577.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [9250. - 9252.]

9250.

Unless the context otherwise requires the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part of this division of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

“Board” means the reclamation board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

“Drainage district” means the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [9260. - 9266.]

9260.

Whenever any assessment levied by the board upon lands within the drainage district has been completed and all of the hearings before the board in regard thereto have been held and the board is ready to make its order approving the assessment as finally fixed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5, Part 4, of this division the board may at the time of making the order finally approving the assessment, also determine, and make a part of the order, that in its judgment it is for the best interests of the owners of land in the drainage district affected by the assessment to issue bonds for the purpose of obtaining money to pay the cost of the works or other expenses for which the assessment was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.

If the board by its order determines to issue bonds, the subsequent proceedings in the matter of the assessment and the collection thereof and all other proceedings for the raising of money to be used for the purposes for which the assessment was levied, shall be in pursuance to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

If the board determines that it is best to issue bonds, the original assessment lists shall not be deposited in the offices of the respective county treasurers as directed by Chapter 5, Part 4, of this division, but shall be retained in the office of the board until after final determination of the judicial proceeding provided for in Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

With the money received from the sale of bonds, the board as the managing body of the drainage district shall proceed with the construction and completion or carrying into execution of the works or project for the purpose of which the assessment upon which the bonds are based was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9264.

No officer shall charge or receive any fee for any services required to be performed by him under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9265.

Any reasonable and necessary expense actually incurred by any officer in carrying out any of the provisions of this part relating in any manner to the collection or enforcement of any assessment, shall be paid out of the funds of the drainage district applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.

If the board or any member, officer, appointee, or employee thereof or any public officer mentioned or referred to in this part fails to perform any duties imposed by this part, the Attorney General shall compel the performance of such act by mandamus proceedings or by any other appropriate legal or equitable remedy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Validating Proceedings [9275. - 9282.]

9275.

If the board determines, pursuant to the provisions of this part, that bonds should be issued, an action to determine the validity of the assessment may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9276.

No objection to the assessment shall be considered by the court unless the objection has been made in writing to the board as provided in Part 4 of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9277.

The judgment shall refer to the assessment apportioned to each county separately and it shall be sufficient to refer to the portions of the assessment which are affected by the judgment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9278.

Unless the aggregate amount of the whole of the assessment is modified or amended by the judgment in the proceedings so as to cause a difference of more than 212 percent greater or less than the original total amount of the assessment, the assessment shall not be deemed to have been substantially modified and no necessity shall exist for a reapportionment thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9279.

The assessment lists, unless annulled by the judgment in the judicial proceeding, embracing any modifications made by the judgment are conclusive evidence that the assessment has been apportioned according to the benefits that will accrue to each tract of land in the drainage district by reason of the expenditure of the sums of money to be raised thereby.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9280.

A certified copy of the judgment referring to the assessment lists shall be filed in the office of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9281.

A certified copy of so much of the judgment as relates to the lands in each of the counties affected thereby shall be affixed to the original assessment list for such county and the board shall thereupon cause such amendments or modifications to be made and entered upon the original assessment lists as may be necessary to make them conform to the provisions and directions of the judgment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------

9282.

The assessment lists as amended or modified shall be certified by the secretary or assistant secretary of the board as being in conformity with the requirements of the judgment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1536.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Assessments [9305. - 9320.]

9305.

In the event that the assessment is annulled as a whole by the judicial proceeding, the board shall cause a new assessment to be made as provided in Part 4 of this division, and thereafter the same proceedings shall be had in regard thereto as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

When, if necesssary, the assessment lists have been modified and amended to conform to the requirements of the judgment and have been certified as provided in this part, the board shall file them in the offices of the county treasurers of the several counties in which are situated any of the lands assessed thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

Each county treasurer shall indorse on the assessment list the time to the hour and minute when it was so filed in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9308.

From the time of filing as provided in the next preceding section the assessment constitutes a lien upon the lands in the county so assessed and imparts notice to all subsequent purchasers or encumbrancers or any person acquiring any interest in or lien upon the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9309.

At any time within 30 days after the assessment list is filed in the office of the county treasurer as provided in Section 9307, the whole amount of the assessment upon any tract of land therein separately assessed may be paid in cash to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9310.

Upon such payment the county treasurer shall issue his receipt and indorse the fact and date of payment upon the assessment list, and thereupon the lien of the assessment upon the tract of land ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9311.

The report of payment of the assessment shall be made by the county treasurer at once to the secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9312.

The amount of assessments received by the county treasurer shall, within 30 days after receipt thereof by him, be deposited by him with the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9313.

The State Treasurer shall credit the amount of assessments received by him to the construction fund of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9314.

All assessments not paid in full within the 30-day period bear interest thereafter at the rate of 7 per cent per annum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9315.

If the amounts raised by means of the assesssment as provided in this part prove insufficient to pay in full all of the bonds and the interest thereon, the board shall levy and collect in the same manner as provided in Part 4 of this division, and this part, a supplementary annual assessment from time to time as may be necessary upon the same lands previously assessed in the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9316.

The supplemental assessment shall be levied by resolution of the board entered in its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9317.

The board need not appoint assessors nor prepare new or additional assessment lists for any supplemental assessment, but the assessment shall be levied and apportioned according to benefits and in the same proportion as specified in the original assessment lists for the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9318.

The board shall, for the purpose of collecting the supplemental assessment, prepare and certify to the county treasurers of the several counties annual assessment collection lists in the same manner and at the same times as provided for the annual assessment collection lists upon the original assesssment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9319.

The supplemental assessment shall be collected by the county treasurers, and the same percentages, penalties and costs added for delinquency and the same proceedings had for sale of property and for redemption thereof and for disposition of the proceeds of sale, and in all other particulars as provided in the case of the annual assessment collection lists upon the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9320.

All money collected for or on account of any supplemental assessment shall be paid over to the State Treasurer in the manner provided in this part, and credited by the State Treasurer to the bond redemption fund of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Bond Elections [9330. - 9389.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [9330. - 9345.]

9330.

Upon the expiration of the 30-day period mentioned in Chapter 4 of this part, an election shall be called and held by the board in that part of the drainage district affected by the assessment or the issuance of bonds, to determine whether the money necessary to pay the cost of the works and other expenses to be paid out of the assessment shall be raised by calls to be made upon the assessment in such installments as may from time to time be determined by the board, or whether bonds of the drainage district shall be issued in an amount equal to the amount of the assessment then remaining unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9331.

The unpaid amount shall be entered by the board in its records and stated by the board in its order for the election and the order for the election shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9332.

At the election the owner of each tract of land assessed in and by the assessment, upon which the assessment has not been paid as provided in Chapter 4 of this part, may, in person or by proxy, cast one vote for each one cent ($0.01) of the amount for which the tract is assessed by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9333.

In case there is more than one owner of any tract of land separately assessed in and by the assessment, all of the owners shall unite in the ballot to be cast at the election for and on behalf of the tract, or shall authorize one or more of their number or some other person to cast the vote for them by proxy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9334.

Guardians, conservators, executors, administrators and other persons holding land in a trust capacity under appointment of court may vote at the election without obtaining special authority therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

9335.

The vote of any public or private corporation or of any reclamation district, levee district, drainage district or other public agency entitled to vote at the election, may be cast by any person authorized by the board of directors or trustees or other managing body thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9336.

The authorization shall be in writing and certified to by the secretary or clerk of the district or public agency and attested by its seal duly acknowledged and filed with the board of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9337.

No person shall vote by proxy at the election unless authority to vote is evidenced by an instrument in writing duly executed, acknowledged and certified in the same manner as grants of real property and filed with the board of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9338.

In case of change of ownership of any tract of land, or in case the name of the owner of any tract of land is not correctly stated in the voting list, or in case the land is assessed to unknown owners, the right to vote shall belong to the owner of the land at the time of the holding of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9339.

If the right of any person to vote as the owner of any such tract of land is disputed or challenged, the question of his right to vote shall be determined by the board of election after examining him under oath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9340.

The oath may be administered by any member of the board of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9341.

Any person testifying falsely upon such examination is guilty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9342.

Any person voting or attempting to vote at the election who is not entitled to vote at it, as provided in this part, is subject to the same penalties and punishments as provided by the general election laws of this State, for voting or attempting to vote illegally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9343.

For the purpose of determining the “reference number” of each tract separately assessed upon the assessment lists, the board shall, before preparing the voting lists, cause each tract of land separately assessed upon the assessment lists, unless already done, to be given a separate number designated as the “reference number” of the tract. The reference numbers shall be entered upon the assessment lists opposite the several tracts separately assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9344.

If the result of the election provided for in this chapter is against the issuance of bonds, then the assessment, or that portion thereof involved in and affected by the election shall be ordered paid and collected in such installments and as often as may in the judgment of the board be necessary for the purpose for which the assessment was originally levied as provided in Part 5 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9345.

All subsequent proceedings in regard to the assessment shall be conducted as provided in Part 4 of this division and without any further reference to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Polling Places, Notices and Board of Election [9355. - 9369.]

9355.

The board shall, in its order providing for the election, specify the day on which the election is to be held and shall specify and designate one or more polling places in each supervisor district wherein are situated any of the lands affected by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9356.

In case the board considers it necessary or proper to provide more than one polling place in any supervisor district for the holding of the election, the board shall in its order divide the lands in the supervisor district and within the drainage district, into separate voting districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9357.

The board shall designate and provide one polling place within each voting district at which shall be cast the votes of the owners of land within the voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9358.

The board may combine contiguous portions of different supervisor districts into one voting district in cases where the lands in the voting district are not assessed to more than 100 different owners, counting one owner for each tract assessed to unknown owners and counting the estate of a deceased person as one owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9359.

The board shall in the order providing the election, appoint a board of election for each polling place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9360.

The board of election shall consist of three owners of land assessed in and by the assessment and situated within the voting district where the polling place is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9361.

Each member of the board of election, whether appointed by the board or whether acting as a substitute as provided in this part, is entitled to the sum of five dollars ($5) for his services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9362.

The compensation of the election officers shall be paid by the board out of any funds of the drainage district or of the board applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9363.

If any person appointed as a member of the board of election fails to attend at the opening of the polls, the voters then present at the polling place may appoint in his place any landowner of the district then present and entitled to vote at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9364.

Each member of the board of election before entering upon the discharge of his duties shall take and subscribe an official oath, which may be administered by any officer authorized by law to administer oaths, or by any landowner in the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9365.

The oath shall be to the effect that he will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State and that he will faithfully perform his duties as member of the election board to the best of his ability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9366.

Notice of the election shall be given by the board by posting notices thereof in at least three public places in each voting district at least 21 days prior to the election, and also by publication for the same length of time in some newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any portion of the land assessed in and by the assessment is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9367.

The notice shall specify the time and place of holding the election, the aggregate face value of bonds proposed to be issued, and the names of the persons appointed to act as the board of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9368.

Affidavits of publication and posting of the notices shall be filed with the county elections official of the county in which the notices have been posted or published, together with a copy of the order calling the election certified to by the secretary or assistant secretary of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9369.

Duplicate original affidavits of publication and posting of the notice, shall be filed in the office of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voting Lists and Ballots [9375. - 9379.]

9375.

The board shall, prior to the election, cause to be prepared and certified by its secretary or assistant secretary, and furnished to the board of election in each voting district, a true and correct voting list containing all of the following:

(a) The reference number of each tract separately assessed upon the assessment list.

(b) The name of the person to whom each tract assessed.

(c) The amount of the assessment on each tract with reference to which the election is to be held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9376.

The voting list shall be used by the board of election in determining the right to vote and the number of votes to be cast by each voter, and shall be sufficient evidence of these matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9377.

The ballot cast at the election shall contain the words “Bonds—Yes,” or the words “Bonds—No,” and also the signature of the person casting the ballot, with the number of votes cast by the voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

9378.

A ballot cast by proxy shall contain the name of the landowner for whom the ballot is cast and the signature of the person casting the vote as proxy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)